Wisconsin, session 2025, SB154.
do enact as follows:SB154,11Section 1. 49.79 (7x) of the statutes is created to read:SB154,2,2249.79 (7x) Exclusions; food stamp program. (a) In this subsection:SB154,2,331. “Candy” has the meaning given in s. 77.51 (1fm).SB154,2,442. “Soft drinks” has the meaning given in s. 77.51 (17w).SB154,2,135(b) The department shall request any necessary waiver from the U.S. 6department of agriculture in accordance with 7 USC 2026 to prohibit the use of 7benefits under the food stamp program for the purchase of candy or soft drinks from 8the list of eligible foods under 7 CFR 271.2. If a waiver requested under this 9paragraph is granted the department shall prohibit the purchase of candy or soft 10drinks with benefits provided through the federal food stamp program. If any 11necessary waiver from the U.S. department of agriculture is not granted, then the 12department shall submit the waiver request under this paragraph annually until 13the waiver is granted.SB154,2,1414